Hawaii, session 2026, HB2398.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 302A-1120, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§302A-1120[]]  Public library system; board control.  (a) The board, through the state librarian, shall have direct control of the public library system, but not including school libraries. (b)  The board, through the state librarian, shall have exclusive authority over the development, use, support, and improvement and maintenance of public library system facilities pursuant to section 312-1.  If the board has a legally recognized interest in land on which it has approved development or expansion of a public library system facility, but the land is not exclusively under the jurisdiction of the public library system, then the board may authorize the state librarian to exercise exclusive control over that interest to effectuate the purpose of the development or expansion; provided that funds have been appropriated by the legislature for the development or expansion project. (c)  The board may adopt rules under chapter 91 for the purpose of this section." SECTION 2.  Section 302A-1506.2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§302A-1506.2[]]  Property acquisition, use, and disposition.  (a) The department may acquire or contract to acquire by grant or purchase any real, personal, or mixed property or any interest therein for its immediate or future use for public educational purposes, including lease revenues; and own, hold, improve, and rehabilitate any real, personal, or mixed property acquired, and sell, assign, exchange, transfer, convey, lease, or otherwise dispose of, or encumber the same; provided that the department shall incur all fees and costs associated with, and for, the subdividing of the land. (b) The department may by itself, or in partnership with qualified persons, acquire, construct, reconstruct, rehabilitate, improve, alter, or repair any infrastructure or accessory facilities in connection with any project; and own, hold, sell, assign, transfer, convey, exchange, lease, or otherwise dispose of, or encumber any project. (c) The department may lease or rent all or a portion of any real property acquired for public educational purposes and establish and revise the rents or charges therefor.  The department shall not sell any property, real or personal, or any interest therein, except to a government entity. (d) The department may insure or provide for the insurance of its property or operations against risks as it deems advisable. (e)  Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, for land controlled by the department that the board has vested exclusive control to the state librarian pursuant to section 302A-1120, the department shall expeditiously cooperate with the state librarian and public library system to effectuate any project authorized by the board. [(e)]  (f)  For the purposes of this section: "Land" or "property" includes vacant land or land with site improvements, whether partially or entirely finished in accordance with governmental subdivision standards, or with complete dwellings. "Public educational purposes" includes any use of the property, including revenue generation, that would benefit the department's mission to provide public education to students in the State. "Real property" includes lands, land under water, structures, and any agreed upon easements, franchises, and incorporeal hereditaments and every estate and right therein, legal and equitable, including terms for years and liens by way of judgment, mortgage, or otherwise." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 31, 2055.